California, session 20252026, AB393.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19134.2 is added to the Government Code, to read:19134.2. Before entering into a personal services contract to have a contractor fill a budgeted State Bargaining Unit 16 (BU-16) physician position, including a psychiatrist, or a State Bargaining Unit 19 (BU-19) psychologist position, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the State Department of State Hospitals, as applicable, shall do all of the following:(a) Prepare an analysis comparing the hourly cost of a contractor to a civil service BU-16 physician or BU-19 psychologist.(b) For purposes of the analysis in subdivision (a), the applicable department shall utilize current civil service physicians or psychologists set forth in the collective bargaining agreements between the State of California and BU-16 or BU-19 when arriving at the cost of civil service physicians or psychologists.(c) If the cost of a contractor exceeds that of a civil service physician or psychologist, then the applicable department shall utilize an available civil service physician or psychologist before hiring a contractor.(d) (1) No later than January 15 of each year, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and the State Department of State Hospitals shall provide a report to BU-16, BU-19, the Senate Committee on Budget and Fiscal Review, and the Assembly Committee on Budget a report, as set forth in paragraph (2). (2) The report shall contain details regarding the number of required analyses completed in the prior fiscal year, the number and cost of contractors employed, and the number of civil service physicians and psychologists utilized in extra shifts and the cost thereof.(3) The report submitted to the legislative committees pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.